Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.340

Assistance for parolees, work release, and discharged prisoners—Use and repayment of funds belonging to absconders.

Any funds in the hands of the department of corrections, or which may come into its hands, which belong to discharged prisoners, inmates assigned to work/training release facilities, parolees or persons convicted of a felony and granted probation who absconded, or whose whereabouts are unknown, shall be deposited in the community services revolving fund. Said funds shall be used to defray the expenses of clothing and other necessities and for transporting discharged prisoners, inmates assigned to work/training release facilities, parolees and persons convicted of a felony and granted probation who are without means to secure the same. All payments disbursed from these funds shall be repaid, whenever possible, by discharged prisoners, inmates assigned to work/training release facilities, parolees and persons convicted of a felony and granted probation for whose benefit they are made. Whenever any money belonging to such persons is so paid into the revolving fund, it shall be repaid to them in accordance with law if a claim therefor is filed with the department of corrections within five years of deposit into said fund and upon a clear showing of a legal right of such claimant to such money. This section applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 349; 1986 c 125 s 3; 1981 c 136 s 47; 1971 ex.s. c 31 s 4; 1961 c 217 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.